src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AHL_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - áljahl - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AHL_STEM_1

     áljahl+V+Sg+Impv: áljahl
     áljahl+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: áljahl
     áljahl+V+Rel: áljahls
     áljahl+V+Interr+Fut+Long: áljahläsaa
     áljahl+V+Interr+Fut+Short: áljahläs
     áljahl+V+Simp+Fut: áljahläsaang
     áljahl+V+Imm+Fut: áljahläsga
     áljahl+V+Rel+Fut: áljahläsaas
     áljahl+V+Fut+NonFact: áljahläsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼuuj
     áljahl+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Res: áljahläsaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: áljahlʼus
     áljahl+V+Bias+Interr+Past: áljahlʼujaa
     áljahl+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼuujaangaa
     áljahl+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: áljahläsaaʼus
     áljahl+V+Cert+Fut: áljahläsaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: áljahläseehl
     áljahl+V+Pl+Impv: áljahlʼuu
     áljahl+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼwaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼwaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼwaang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Dir+Past: áljahlʼwägan
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Past: áljahlʼaawaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Indir+Past: áljahlʼaawaan
     áljahl+V+3pl+Rel: áljahlʼwaas
     áljahl+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: áljahlʼaawaas
     áljahl+V+3pl+NonFact: áljahlʼwaa.ang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: áljahlʼaawaa.ang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼwägiinii
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼwägaangaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼwägaangaan
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: áljahlʼwaaäsaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: áljahlʼwaaäs
     áljahl+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: áljahlʼwaaäsaang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: áljahlʼwaaäsga
     áljahl+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: áljahlʼwaaäsaas
     áljahl+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: áljahlʼwaaäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Near+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     áljahl+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼwaaʼuuj
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼwaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Res: áljahlʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: áljahlʼwaaʼus
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: áljahlʼwaaʼujaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: áljahlʼwaaäsaaʼus
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: áljahlʼwaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cert+Past: áljahlʼwaaʼahlanggan
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: áljahlʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: áljahlʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: áljahlʼwaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+3pl+Ints+Past: áljahlʼaawaaʼahlang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Cont: áljahlʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: áljahlʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+3pl+Rflx: áljahlʼwaaʼahl
     áljahl+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: áljahlʼwaaäseehl
     áljahl+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: áljahlʼang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼangga
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Dir+Past: áljahlʼanggan
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Past: áljahlʼaangaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Indir+Past: áljahlʼaangaan
     áljahl+V+Neg+Rel: áljahlʼans
     áljahl+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: áljahlʼaangaas
     áljahl+V+Neg+NonFact: áljahlʼangang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: áljahlʼaangaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: áljahlʼanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼanggiinii
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼanggaangaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼanggaangaan
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: áljahlʼangäsaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: áljahlʼangäs
     áljahl+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: áljahlʼangäsaang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: áljahlʼangäsga
     áljahl+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: áljahlʼangäsaas
     áljahl+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: áljahlʼangäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼangʼuuj
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼangʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Res: áljahlʼangäsaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: áljahlʼangʼus
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: áljahlʼangʼujaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼuujaangaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: áljahlʼangäsaaʼus
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: áljahlʼaangʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cert+Past: áljahlʼaangʼahlanggan
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: áljahlʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: áljahlʼangäsaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: áljahlʼaangʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Neg+Ints+Past: áljahlʼaangaaʼahlang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Cont: áljahlʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: áljahlʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+Rflx: áljahlʼaangʼahl
     áljahl+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: áljahlʼangäseehl
     áljahl+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: áljahlʼangʼuu
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: áljahlʼangʼwägan
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: áljahlʼangʼaawaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: áljahlʼangʼaawaan
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: áljahlʼangʼwaas
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: áljahlʼangʼaawaas
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: áljahlʼangʼwaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: áljahlʼangʼaawaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼwägiinii
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼwägaangaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼwägaangaan
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: áljahlʼangʼwaaäs
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsga
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaas
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: áljahlʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Res: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼus
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: áljahlʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: áljahlʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: áljahlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: áljahlʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: áljahlʼangʼwaaʼahl
     áljahl+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: áljahlʼangʼwaaäseehl
